Alabama, session 2026rs, SB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
22 Section 1. The Legislature finds that there is a
23 retirement savings access gap; Americans reach the median
24 salary four years later than they did in 1980 and therefore
25 have four fewer years of savings opportunities; and that one
26 in six Americans retire in poverty. Employees are unable to
27 effectively build their retirement savings risk living on low
28 incomes in their elderly years and are more likely to become
Page 1

incomes in their elderly years and are more likely to become
SB135 INTRODUCED
29 dependent on state services. The Legislature further finds
30 that a state facilitated retirement savings program would
31 remove barriers to entry into the retirement market for
32 businesses by educating eligible employers on plan
33 availability and promoting, without mandated participation,
34 qualified, low-cost, and low-burden retirement savings
35 vehicles and without posing any significant financial burden
36 upon taxpayers. To this end, the legislation, upon
37 implementation, will help close the retirement savings access
38 gap, protect the fiscal stability of the state and its
39 residents well into the future, and will educate and promote
40 retirement savings among employees.
41 Section 2. For purposes of this act the following terms
42 having the following meanings:
43 (1) ALABAMA RETIREMENT SAVINGS PROGRAM or PROGRAM. The
44 retirement savings program created to connect eligible
45 employers and their employees with approved plans to increase
46 retirement savings.
47 (2) APPROVED PLANS. Retirement plans offered by the
48 Alabama Retirement Savings Program that meet the requirements
49 of this chapter.
50 (3) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Workforce.
51 (4) ELIGIBLE EMPLOYER. A self-employed individual, sole
52 proprietor, or an independently owned , for-profit enterprise
53 with 500 or fewer employees at the time of enrollment.
54 (5) ENROLLEE. Any employee who is voluntarily enrolled
55 in an approved plan offered by an eligible employer.
56 (6) FUND. The Alabama Retirement Savings Program Fund.
Page 2

(6) FUND. The Alabama Retirement Savings Program Fund.
SB135 INTRODUCED
57 (7) INDIVIDUAL RETIRMENT ARRANGEMENT. A retirement
58 savings account which allows employees to save for their
59 retirement by contributing pre-tax or after-tax dollars.
60 (8) PARTICIPATING EMPLOYER. Any eligible employer that
61 provides a payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement
62 provided under this act for its employees who are enrolled in
63 an approved plan offered through the Alabama Facilitated
64 Retirement Savings Program.
65 (9) QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE. Employees defined by the
66 federal Internal Revenue Service to be eligible to participate
67 in a specific qualified plan.
68 (10) SECRETARY. The Secretary of the Alabama Department
69 of Workforce.
70 (11) WAGES. Any compensation within the meaning of
71 Title 26 U.S.C. Section 219(b)(1)(A) that is received by an
72 enrollee from a participating employer or employee leasing
73 company or professional employer organization with which the
74 enrollee's employer has an employee leasing agreement.
75 Section 3. (a) A retirement savings program in the form
76 of an automatic enrollment payroll deduction IRA, known as the
77 Alabama Retirement Savings Program, shall be established and
78 administered by the Secretary of the Alabama Department of
79 Workforce, for the purpose of promoting greater retirement
80 savings for private sector employees in a convenient,
81 low-cost, and portable manner.
82 (1) The Secretary of Workforce shall have the authority
83 to enter into contracts with other entities, including private
84 financial institutions, to design, manage, invest, or
Page 3

financial institutions, to design, manage, invest, or
SB135 INTRODUCED
85 otherwise administer the program on behalf of the department.
86 Contracts for professional services entered into by the
87 secretary shall be entered into by competitive sealed
88 proposals pursuant to Division 3, commencing with Section
89 41-4-130 of Article 5 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, Code of
90 Alabama 1975.
91 (2) The Alabama Retirement Savings Program Fund is
92 established as a special fund, separate and apart from all
93 public monies or funds of this state. The fund shall include
94 the individual retirement accounts of enrollees, which shall
95 be accounted for as individual accounts. Monies in the fund
96 shall consist of monies received from enrollees directly and
97 through participating employers pursuant to automatic payroll
98 deductions and contributions to savings made pursuant to this
99 act. The fund shall be operated in a manner determined by the
100 secretary exclusively for the purpose of this act without
101 liability on the part of the state beyond the amounts paid
102 into and earned by the fund, provided that the fund is
103 operated so that the accounts of enrollees established under
104 the program meet the requirements for IRAs under the Internal
105 Revenue Code.
106 (b) The amounts deposited in the fund shall not
107 constitute property of the state, and the fund shall not be
108 construed to be a department, institution, or agency of the
109 state. Amounts on deposit in the fund shall not be commingled
110 with state funds and the state shall have no claim to or
111 against, or interest in, such funds.
112 Section 4. The Alabama Retirement Savings
Page 4

Section 4. The Alabama Retirement Savings
SB135 INTRODUCED
113 Administrative Fund is created in the State Treasury. The fund
114 shall be administered by the secretary and used exclusively
115 for the purpose of this act. The department shall use monies
116 in this administrative fund to pay for the administrative
117 expenses it incurs in the performance of its duties under this
118 act. The department shall use monies in this administrative
119 fund to cover startup administrative expenses it incurs in the
120 performance of its duties under this act. This administrative
121 fund may receive grants or other monies designated for
122 administrative purposes from the state or any unit of federal
123 or local government or any other person, firm, partnership, or
124 corporation. Any interest earnings that are attributable to
125 monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund. All funds
126 deposited or transferred into the fund shall be budgeted and
127 allocated in accordance with Sections 41-4-80 through 41-4-96,
128 Code of Alabama 1975, and Sections 41-19-1 through 41-19-12,
129 Code of Alabama 1975.
130 Section 5. (a) The department, secretary, and any other
131 agents or employees appointed or engaged by the Alabama
132 Department of Workforce and all persons serving as a program
133 staff shall discharge their duties with respect to the program
134 solely in the interest of the program's enrollees and
135 beneficiaries as follows:
136 (1) By investing with the care, skill, prudence, and
137 diligence under the prevailing circumstances that a prudent
138 person acting in a like capacity and familiar with those
139 matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a similar
140 character and with similar aims.
Page 5

character and with similar aims.
SB135 INTRODUCED
141 (2) By using any contributions paid by employees
142 directly and through participating employers pursuant to
143 automatic payroll deductions and contributions into the fund
144 exclusively for the purpose of paying benefits to the
145 enrollees of the program, for the cost of administration of
146 the program, and for investments made for the benefit of the
147 program.
148 (b) The secretary shall ensure that the establishment
149 design and operation of the program is in a manner that meets
150 all of the following:
151 (1) Is in accordance with best practices for retirement
152 savings vehicles.
153 (2) Maximizes participation, savings, and sound
154 investment practices.
155 (3) Maximizes simplicity, including ease of
156 administration for participating employers and enrollees.
157 (4) Provides an efficient product to enrollees by
158 pooling investment funds.
159 (5) Ensures the portability of benefits.
160 (6) Provides for the deaccumulation of enrollee assets
161 in a manner that maximizes financial security in retirement.
162 Section 6. (a) In addition to the other duties and
163 responsibilities, the department may:
164 (1) Explore and establish investment options, subject
165 to Section 8, that offer employees returns on contributions
166 and the conversion of individual retirement savings account
167 balances to secure retirement income without incurring debt or
168 liabilities to the state;
Page 6

liabilities to the state;
SB135 INTRODUCED
169 (2) Establish the process by which interest, investment
170 earnings, and investment losses are allocated to individual
171 program accounts on a pro rata basis and are computed at the
172 interest rate on the balance of an individual's account;
173 (3) Make and enter into contracts necessary for the
174 administration of the program and the fund, including, but not
175 limited to, retaining and contracting with investment
176 managers, private financial institutions, other financial and
177 service providers, consultants, actuaries, counsel, auditors,
178 third-party administrators, and other professionals as
179 necessary. Contracts for professional services entered into by
180 the department shall be entered into by competitive sealed
181 proposals pursuant to Division 3, commencing with Section
182 41-4-13 of Article 5 of Chapter 4 of Title 41, Code of Alabama
183 1975.
184 (4) Conduct a review of the performance of any
185 investment vendors not less than once every two years,
186 including, but not limited to, a review of returns, fees, and
187 customer service and post a copy on an Internet website
188 established and maintained by the department;
189 (5) Determine the number of staff members and duties
190 needed to administer the program;
191 (6) Ensure that monies in the Alabama Retirement
192 Savings Program Fund are held and invested as pooled
193 investments described in Section 8, with a view of achieving
194 cost savings through efficiencies and economies of scale;
195 (7) Evaluate and establish the process by which an
196 enrollee is able to contribute a portion of the enrollees
Page 7

enrollee is able to contribute a portion of the enrollees
SB135 INTRODUCED
197 wages, a minimum of three percent, to the program for
198 automatic deposit of those contributions and the process by
199 which the participating employer provides a payroll deposit
200 retirement savings arrangement to forward those contributions
201 and related information to the program, including, but not
202 limited to, contracting with financial service companies and
203 third-party administrators with the capability to receive and
204 process employee information and contributions for payroll
205 deposit retirement savings arrangements or similar
206 arrangements;
207 (8) Design and establish the process for enrollment by
208 an employee pursuant to Section 9, including the process by
209 which an employee can opt not to participate in the program,
210 select a contribution level, increase the contribution level,
211 select an investment option, such as a traditional IRA or ROTH
212 IRA, and terminate participation in the program;
213 (9) Evaluate and establish the process by which an
214 individual may voluntarily enroll in and make contributions to
215 the program;
216 (10) Accept any grants, appropriations, or other monies
217 from the state, any unit of federal, state, or local
218 government or any other person, firm, partnership, or
219 corporation solely for deposit into the fund, whether for
220 investments or administrative purposes;
221 (11) Evaluate the need for, and procure as needed,
222 insurance against any and all loss in connection with
223 property, assets, or activities of the program;
224 (12) Make provisions for the payment of administrative
Page 8

(12) Make provisions for the payment of administrative
SB135 INTRODUCED
225 costs and expenses for the creation, management, and operation
226 of the program and keep annual administrative fees as low as
227 possible, but in no other event shall annual administrative
228 fees exceed 0.6 percent of the fund's total balance, except
229 that, during the first three years after the establishment of
230 the program annual administrative fees may be set at no more
231 than 0.75 percent of the fund's total balance. Administrative
232 fees shall include any investment fees incurred pursuant to
233 this section. Subject to appropriation, the state may pay
234 administrative costs associated with the creation and
235 management of the program until sufficient assets are
236 available in the fund for that purpose. Thereafter, all
237 administrative costs of the program, including repayment of
238 any funds provided by the state, shall be paid only out of
239 monies in deposit therein, except that, private funds or
240 federal funding received under subdivision (10) in order to
241 implement the program shall not be repaid unless those funds
242 were offered contingent upon the promise of repayment;
243 (13) Allocate administrative fees to individual
244 retirement accounts in the program on a pro rata basis;
245 (14) Set a minimum employee contribution amount of
246 three percent;
247 (15) Facilitate education and outreach to employers and
248 employees, including the promotion of the benefits of
249 retirement savings and other information that promote
250 financial literacy necessary for sound financial
251 decision-making;
252 (16) Facilitate compliance by the program with all
Page 9

(16) Facilitate compliance by the program with all
SB135 INTRODUCED
253 applicable requirements for the program under the Internal
254 Revenue Code, including tax qualification requirements or any
255 other applicable law and accounting requirements;
256 (17) Carry out the duties and obligations of the
257 program in an effective, efficient, and low-cost manner; and
258 (18) Exercise any and all other powers reasonably
259 necessary for the effectuation of the purposes, objectives,
260 and provisions of this act pertaining to the program.
261 Section 7. (a) The program administration shall
262 annually prepare and adopt a written statement of investment
263 policy that includes a risk management and oversight program.
264 The risk management and oversight program shall be designed to
265 ensure that an effective risk management system is in place to
266 monitor the risk levels of the program and to ensure that the
267 risks taken are prudent and properly managed, to provide an
268 integrated process for overall risk management, and to assess
269 investment returns as well as risk to determine if the risks
270 taken are adequately compensated compared to applicable
271 performance benchmarks and standards. The program
272 administration shall submit the statement of investment policy
273 and any changes in the investment policy to the secretary.
274 (b) An audited financial report, prepared in accordance
275 with generally accepted accounting principles, on the
276 operations of the program for each calendar year, shall be
277 submitted to the secretary no later than July 1 of the
278 following year. The annual audit shall be made by an
279 independent certified public accountant and shall include, but
280 is not limited to, direct and indirect costs attributable to
Page 10

is not limited to, direct and indirect costs attributable to
SB135 INTRODUCED
281 the use of outside consultants, independent contractors, and
282 any other persons who are not state employees for the
283 administration of the program.
284 (c) A report prepared by the Alabama Department of
285 Workforce shall include, but not be limited to, a summary of
286 the benefits provided by the program, the number of enrollees
287 in the program, the percentage and number of investment
288 options, rates of return, fees paid to any vendors or
289 contractors for purposes of implementing or operating the
290 program, and other information that is relevant to make a
291 full, fair, and effective disclosure of the operation of the
292 program and the funds.
293 (d) The department shall make available to the public
294 on its Internet website all reports provided to the
295 department. In addition to any other statements or reports
296 required by law, the department shall provide periodic reports
297 at least annually to: (i) participating employers, the names
298 of each enrollee employed by the participating employer, and
299 the contribution amounts made through the participating
300 employer on behalf of each enrolled employee from automatic
301 payroll deductions and contributions during the reporting
302 period; and (ii) participating enrollees, the balances in
303 their program accounts for the reporting period, including the
304 allocation of contributions and investment income to, and any
305 withdrawals made from their program accounts. The reports may
306 include any other information regarding the program as the
307 secretary determines appropriate.
308 Section 8. (a) The secretary shall ensure that monies
Page 11

Section 8. (a) The secretary shall ensure that monies
SB135 INTRODUCED
309 in the fund be invested or reinvested, as the case may be, in
310 compliance with any and all applicable federal and state laws,
311 rules, and regulations, as well as any and all rules or
312 regulations adopted by the department with respect to the
313 program and the investment of the fund, including, but not
314 limited to, the investment policy.
315 (b) The secretary may require the establishment of any
316 or all of the following investment options:
317 (1) A capital preservation fund, which prioritizes the
318 security of the deposit over the rate of return. If the
319 capital preservation fund is established, the department may
320 provide that the first one thousand dollars ($1,000) in
321 contributions made by, or on behalf of, an enrollee shall be
322 deposited into the capital preservation fund and the
323 department may provide for an account revocation period during
324 which, if the enrollee chooses to end participation in the
325 program, the enrollee may withdraw the deposited amounts from
326 the capital preservation fund without penalty.
327 (2) A life-cycle fund.
328 (3) Any other investment option deemed appropriate by
329 the secretary.
330 (c) The secretary may designate by rule or regulation
331 one of the investment options as the default investment option
332 for enrollees who fail to elect an investment option and may,
333 from time to time, amend, modify, or repeal such investment
334 options as it deems necessary or proper and may subsequently
335 select, by rule or regulation, a different investment option
336 as the default investment option.
Page 12

as the default investment option.
SB135 INTRODUCED
337 Section 9. (a) The program shall be implemented, and
338 the enrollment of employees shall begin, within 24 months
339 after the effective date of this act. The Secretary of
340 Workforce may extend the time period within which the program
341 is implemented and enrollment of employees begins, but not by
342 more than 12 months. The program shall be implemented in two
343 phases based on the number of the employers participating, as
344 measured by the number of employees per employer, with the
345 program implemented sooner for larger employers. The following
346 provisions of this section shall be in force after the program
347 opens for enrollment.
348 (b) Each employer shall establish a payroll deposit
349 retirement savings arrangement to allow each employee to
350 participate in the program not more than nine months after the
351 program opens for enrollment.
352 (c) Employers shall automatically enroll in the program
353 each employee who has not opted out of participation in the
354 program and shall provide payroll deposit retirement savings
355 arrangements for participating employees and, on behalf of the
356 employees, remit payroll deduction contributions to the
357 program. Eligible employers shall provide payroll deposit
358 retirement savings arrangements for each employee who elects
359 to participate in the program.
360 (d) Enrollees shall have the ability to select a
361 contribution level into the fund. This level may be expressed
362 as a percentage of wages or as a dollar amount up to the
363 deductible amount for the enrollee's taxable year under Title
364 26 U.S.C. Section 219(b)(1)(A). Enrollees may change their
Page 13

26 U.S.C. Section 219(b)(1)(A). Enrollees may change their
SB135 INTRODUCED
365 contribution level no more than once every calendar quarter,
366 subject to rules and regulations adopted by the secretary, as
367 long as the contributions do not cause the enrollee's total
368 contributions to IRAs for the year to exceed the deductible
369 amount for the enrollee's taxable year under Title 26 U.S.C.
370 Section 219(b)(1)(A).
371 (e) Following initial implementation of the program
372 pursuant to this section, at least once every year,
373 participating employers shall designate an open enrollment
374 period during which employees who previously opted out of the
375 program may enroll in the program.
376 (f)(1) For any employee hired by an employer more than
377 six months after the program opens for enrollment, the
378 employer shall enroll the employee in the program no later
379 than three months following the date of hire of the employee,
380 unless the employee opts out of enrollment in the program.
381 (2) Any newly hired employee who has previously been
382 enrolled in the program shall have the option of making direct
383 contributions into that employee's existing account, provided
384 that subdivision (1) also applies to the employer of a newly
385 hired employee who has been previously enrolled in the
386 program.
387 (g) An employee who opts out of the program who
388 subsequently wants to participate through the participating
389 employer's payroll deposit retirement savings arrangement may
390 only enroll during the participating employer's designated
391 open enrollment period or if permitted by the participating
392 employer at an earlier time.
Page 14

employer at an earlier time.
SB135 INTRODUCED
393 (h) An employee may terminate his or her participation
394 in the program at any time in a manner prescribed by the
395 secretary.
396 (i) The department may establish and maintain an
397 Internet website designed to assist employers in identifying
398 private sector providers of retirement arrangements that can
399 be set up by the employer rather than allowing employee
400 participation in the program under this act. The department
401 shall provide public notice of the availability of and the
402 process for inclusion on the Internet website before it
403 becomes publicly available.
404 (j) Each employer is responsible for the tasks
405 described in subsections (b) and (c), but the employer is
406 permitted to contract with a third party, such as a payroll
407 service provider or a professional employer organization, to
408 perform those tasks on behalf of the employer.
409 Section 10. (a) Participating employers shall not have
410 any liability for an employee's decision to participate in or
411 opt out of the program or for the investment decisions of the
412 department or of any enrollee.
413 (b) The program is not an employer-sponsored plan and
414 is not operated or administered by the employer. A
415 participating employer shall not be a fiduciary, or considered
416 to be a fiduciary, over the program and shall not be liable
417 with regard to investment returns, program design, and
418 benefits paid to the program participants. A participating
419 employer shall not bear responsibility for the administration,
420 investment, or investment performance of the program or for
Page 15

investment, or investment performance of the program or for
SB135 INTRODUCED
421 any required or permitted communications between participating
422 employees and program administrators.
423 Section 11. (a) If any clause, sentence, paragraph,
424 section, or other part of this act shall be adjudged by any
425 court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, including any
426 judgment made that the part is unconstitutional, invalid, or
427 inoperative, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or
428 invalidate the remainder of this act but shall be confined in
429 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or
430 other part directly involved in the controversy in which the
431 judgment shall have been rendered.
432 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to
433 the contrary, the value of assets in an individual's account
434 under the program shall not be regarded as assets for the
435 purpose of determining eligibility for benefits or the amount
436 of benefits to be provided pursuant to any state or federal
437 law, except that, if the federal law expressly requires that
438 the assets in the accounts be regarded as assets for those
439 purposes, the assets may be taken into consideration when
440 determining eligibility benefits or the amount of benefits. If
441 the federal law provides discretion to the state in setting
442 standards regarding the amount of assets which may be
443 disregarded in determining benefits, or other factors
444 regarding the assets which impact the eligibility for, or
445 amount of, benefits, the state, with respect to assets in the
446 accounts under the program, shall set standards which are
447 favorable as the federal law permits for the individuals with
448 the accounts.
Page 16

the accounts.
SB135 INTRODUCED
449 Section 12. This act shall become effective on June 1,
450 2026.
Page 17